Utah statutes.
58-38a-202.   Terms of committee service.

(1) (a)  Members of the advisory committee shall serve terms of four years, except that the members under Subsections 58-38a-201(1), (2), and (3) shall serve during their terms as appointed officials.

(b)  Vacancies in the committee occurring otherwise than by the expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments.

(2)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(3) (a)  The director of the Department of Health, or the director's designee, is the chair of the committee.

(b)  The advisory committee meets at the call of the chair or at the call of a majority of the committee members.

(c)  The advisory committee meets annually and more often as required to carry out its duties under this chapter.

(d)  Six members of the advisory committee constitute a quorum.

(e)  Action by the committee requires a majority vote of a quorum.

